Utah statutes.
62A-7-506.   Discharge of youth offender.

(1)  A youth offender may be discharged from the jurisdiction of the division at any time, by written order of the Youth Parole Authority, upon a finding that no further purpose would be served by secure confinement or supervision in a community setting.

(2)  Discharge of a youth offender shall be in accordance with policies approved by the board.

(3)  Discharge of a youth offender is a complete release of all penalties incurred by adjudication of the offense for which the youth offender was committed.

